Utah statutes.
73-3-11.   Statement of financial ability of applicants.

Before either approving or rejecting an application the state engineer may require such additional information as will enable him properly to guard the public interests, and may require a statement of the following facts: In case of an incorporated company, he may require the submission of the articles of incorporation, the names and places of residence of its directors and officers, and the amount of its authorized and its paid-up capital. If the applicant is not a corporation, he may require a showing as to the names of the persons proposing to make the appropriation and a showing of facts necessary to enable him to determine whether or not they are qualified appropriators and have the financial ability to carry out the proposed work, and whether or not the application has been made in good faith.



No Change Since 1953

